fr: Type de benne ou de carrosserie du camion: Caisse fourgon; Benne basculante; Plateau; Fleetside; Plateau à ridelles; Stepside; Caisse utilitaire/de service; Autre
hu: Teherautó plató-/felépítménytípusa: Dobozos/zárt felépítmény; Billenőplató; Nyílt plató; Fleetside; Karós plató; Stepside; Műhelyfelépítmény; Egyéb
bg-BG: Тип на товарния кош/каросерията на камиона: Фургон/затворен тип; Самосвална каросерия; Бордова каросерия; Fleetside; Каросерия с решетки; Stepside; Сервизна каросерия; Друго
it: Tipo di cassone/carrozzeria del furgone: Cassonato/furgonato; Cassone ribaltabile; Pianale; Fleetside; Cassone con sponde; Stepside; Cassone attrezzato/di servizio; Altro
pt-BR: Caçamba/carroceria de caminhonete tipo: Carroceria tipo furgão/baú; Caçamba basculante; Carroceria tipo plataforma; Fleetside; Carroceria de estacas; Stepside; Carroceria utilitária/de serviço; Outro
pt-PT: Tipo de caixa/carroçaria do camião: Caixa/furgão; Caixa basculante; Plataforma; Fleetside; Caixa com taipais; Stepside; Caixa utilitária/de serviço; Outro
nb: Lastebilplan/karosseritype: Skappåbygg; Lasteplan med tipp; Lasteplan; Fleetside; Lasteplan med staker; Stepside; Verktøy-/servicepåbygg; Annet
cs: Typ korby/karoserie nákladního vozidla: Skříňová/dodávková nástavba; Sklápěcí korba; Valníková korba; Fleetside; Valníková korba s klanicemi; Stepside; Užitková/servisní nástavba; Ostatní
ro-RO: Tipul benei/caroseriei camionetei: Caroserie tip dubă/furgon; Benă basculabilă; Platformă; Fleetside; Platformă cu stâlpi/obloane; Stepside; Caroserie utilitară/de service; Altele
en: Truck bed/body type: Box/van body; Dump bed; Flatbed; Fleetside; Stake bed; Stepside; Utility/service body; Other
fi: Kuorma-auton lava-/korityyppi: Umpikori/pakettiauto; Kippilava; Tasolava; Fleetside; Tolppalava; Stepside; Huoltokori; Muu
sk-SK: Typ korby/karosérie nákladného vozidla: Skriňová nadstavba; Vyklápacia korba; Valník; Fleetside; Klanicová korba; Stepside; Úžitková/servisná nadstavba; Iné
ru: Тип кузова или грузовой платформы грузовика: Фургон; Самосвальный кузов; Бортовая платформа; Флитсайд; Платформа с кониками; Степсайд; Сервисный кузов; Другое
de: Art der LKW-Ladefläche/des Aufbaus: Kasten-/Transporteraufbau; Kipppritsche; Pritsche; Fleetside; Rungenpritsche; Stepside; Werkstatt-/Serviceaufbau; Sonstiges
ko: 트럭 적재함/차체 유형: 박스/밴 바디; 덤프 베드; 플랫베드; 플릿사이드; 스테이크 베드; 스텝사이드; 유틸리티/서비스 바디; 기타
sv: Flak/karosserityp: Skåpkaross; Tippflak; Flak; Fleetside; Stakflak; Stepside; Servicekaross; Annat
pl: Typ skrzyni/ zabudowy pickupa: Furgon / zabudowa kontenerowa; Zabudowa typu wywrotka; Platforma; Fleetside; Zabudowa kłonicowa; Stepside; Zabudowa warsztatowa/serwisowa; Inne
hr-HR: Tip karoserije/podvozja kamiona: Zatvoreni/furgonski sanduk; Kiper sanduk; Otvoreni sanduk (platforma); Ravni bočni rubovi (Fleetside); Sanduk sa stupovima; Sanduk sa stepenicom (Stepside); Servisni sanduk; Ostalo
es: Tpo de caja/carrocería del camión: Carrocería de furgón/caja; Caja basculante; Plataforma; Fleetside; Plataforma con estacas; Stepside; Carrocería de servicio/utilitaria; Otro
vi: Loại thùng xe tải/thân xe: Thùng kín/xe tải van; Thùng tự đổ; Thùng sàn phẳng; Thùng sườn phẳng; Thùng cắm cọc; Thùng có bậc bước; Thùng xe tiện ích/dịch vụ; Khác
th: ประเภทกระบะ/ตัวถังรถบรรทุก: กระบะตู้ทึบ/ตู้บรรทุก; กระบะดัมพ์; กระบะพื้นเรียบ; ฟลีตไซด์; กระบะคอก; สเต็ปไซด์; กระบะเชิงพาณิชย์/อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Sunkvežimio kėbulo tipas: Furgono kėbulas; Savivartis; Platforma; „Fleetside“ kėbulas; Kėbulas su statramsčiais; „Stepside“ kėbulas; Komunalinis / techninės priežiūros kėbulas; Kita
da: Lad- eller karosseritype for pickup: Kasse/varevognskasse; Tiplad; Fladt lad; Fleetside; Stolpelad; Stepside; Service-/værkstedskasse; Andet
nl: Truck laadbak-/carrosserietype: Gesloten laadbak; Kipper; Open laadbak; Fleetside; Laadbak met rongen; Stepside; Serviceopbouw; Anders
el: Τύπος καρότσας/αμαξώματος φορτηγού: Κλειστό αμάξωμα (Κουτί/Βαν); Ανατρεπόμενη καρότσα; Επίπεδη καρότσα; Ενιαία καρότσα (Fleetside); Καρότσα με κάγκελα; Καρότσα με σκαλοπάτι (Stepside); Αμάξωμα υπηρεσιών/συντήρησης; Άλλο
tr: Kamyon kasa/gövde tipi: Kapalı kasa/van gövde; Damperli kasa; Düz kasa; Düz yan kasa; Parmaklıklı kasa; Basamaklı kasa; Hizmet/servis gövdesi; Diğer
ja: トラック荷台／ボディタイプ: ボックス / バンボディ; ダンプベッド; フラットベッド; フリートサイド; ステークベッド; ステップサイド; ユーティリティ / サービスボディ; その他
zh-CN: 卡车货箱/车身类型: 厢式车身; 自卸车斗; 平板; 平侧式车斗; 仓栅式车斗; 阶梯式车斗; 多用途/服务车身; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta kesona/karoserije poltovornjaka: Furgon/zaprta nadgradnja; Kiper keson; Ploski keson; Fleetside; Keson z letvami; Stepside; Servisna nadgradnja; Drugo
zh-TW: 卡車貨箱/車身類型: 廂型車身; 傾卸車斗; 平板車斗; 齊平面車斗; 柵欄車斗; 階梯式車側; 多用途/工程車身; 其他